Colorado statutes. TITLE 19 Children's Code
PART 9
TASK FORCE ON HIGH-QUALITY PARENTING TIME

19-3-901. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

Colorado has a strong interest in preserving and strengthening family ties and reducing separation trauma to children who are removed from their birth parents;

The removal and subsequent continued separation between child and birth parent makes sustaining primary relationships difficult and reunification more problematic, and the loss a child experiences when separated from his or her birth parent or parents
is profound, sometimes lasting into adulthood;

For these reasons, it is important to establish clear standards to achieve consistent practices relating to the availability of high-quality parenting time for children who have been removed from a birth parent by government action; and

Clear standards and consistent practices will help ensure that all parents and children have a fair process for determining a parenting time plan that is in the best interests of children and that promotes positive outcomes for families.

Therefore, the general assembly declares that it is valuable to create a task force of persons with experience in or knowledge of the child welfare policy system to examine the current policies and statutes governing parenting time, to study best practices
for the provision of and determination of individualized plans for parenting time, and to make recommendations to the executive branch and to the general assembly on administrative and legislative changes to support high-quality
parenting time in Colorado.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire part added, (HB 21-1101), ch. 481, p. 3430, § 5, effective July 7.

19-3-902. Definitions.

As used in this part 9, unless the context otherwise requires:

"County department" means a county department of human or social services.

"Parenting time" means any form of contact or engagement between parents, legal custodians, or guardians and children when children are placed in out-of-home care in a case brought pursuant to this article 3.

"State department" means the state department of human services.

"Steering committee" means the task force steering committee created in section 19-3-903.

"Task force" means the task force on high-quality parenting time created in section 19-3-903.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire part added, (HB 21-1101), ch. 481, p. 3430, § 5, effective July 7.

19-3-903. Task force on high-quality parenting time - creation - steering committee - membership.

There is created in the state department the task force on high-quality parenting time, for the purpose of studying the issues set forth in section 19-3-904 and making findings and recommendations to the governor, the state department, the child welfare
training academy, and the general assembly on administrative and legislative changes to improve high-quality parenting time services and practices in dependency and neglect cases.

There is created a steering committee for the task force. The members of the steering committee serve as the executive committee of the task force. The steering committee is composed of a representative of the following agencies or organizations, selected
by the executive director of the agency or organization:

The office of the respondent parents' counsel;

The division of child welfare in the department of human services;

The office of the child's representative;

The child protection ombudsman's office; and

A statewide association of human and social services directors.

The membership of the task force must not exceed twenty-five members and, to the extent practicable, must include persons from throughout the state and must reflect the racial, ethnic, and geographic diversity of the state. The steering committee members
are members of the task force. The steering committee shall jointly appoint the remaining task force members by consensus, or, if no consensus is reached, by majority vote of the steering committee. The remaining task force members
must meet the following criteria:

One member representing the court improvement program;

One member who is either retired or currently serving as a judge or magistrate with experience in the child protection system;

Two members who represent service providers, with one member representing service providers who provide services in an urban county and one member representing service providers who provide services in a rural county;

One member who is a director or administrator of a county department;

Three members representing the county departments of human or social services, at least one of which must be a county attorney, with two members representing urban counties and one member representing a rural county;

One member who is a licensed psychiatrist, psychologist, social worker, or therapist who works with children who have been abused or neglected;

Two parents with lived experience in the child welfare system, including a parent who has a disability or has a child with a disability;

Two members with lived experience in the child welfare system as children;

One member who is a foster parent or kinship provider;

A service provider who works with parents or children with disabilities;

A social worker, family advocate, or parent advocate with experience serving families in dependency and neglect cases; and

Any other individual or representative with relevant experience, as determined by the steering committee.

The executive directors of the agencies or organizations specified in subsection (2) of this section shall appoint the steering committee members not later than fifteen days after July 7, 2021. Steering committee members serve at the pleasure of the appointing
authority.

The steering committee shall appoint the remaining task force members described in subsection (3) of this section not later than forty-five days after July 7, 2021, unless the steering committee by majority vote extends the time frame in which to appoint
task force members. Each member of the task force appointed by the steering committee serves at the pleasure of the steering committee and may be removed by a consensus of the steering committee, or, if consensus cannot
be reached, by majority vote of the steering committee.

The members of the task force serve without compensation and without reimbursement for expenses.

The task force shall convene within thirty days after the final member has been appointed to the task force.

The task force shall elect a chair and vice-chair from among its members.

The task force shall meet at least monthly through September 2022, and may meet thereafter to complete its duties.

The steering committee may seek input from subject-matter experts or others to facilitate the work of the task force.

The steering committee shall select a facilitator to be funded through gifts, grants, donations, or federally allocated funds that may be used for this purpose, and is authorized to seek, accept, and expend gifts, grants, or donations.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire part added, (HB 21-1101), ch. 481, p. 3431, § 5, effective July 7.

19-3-904. Task force - purposes - issues to study - written reports.

The purpose of the task force is to:

Study current laws, rules, and practices followed in the state including current capacity for supervised parenting time in dependency and neglect cases where children have been removed from a parent;

Study and review research and best practices for parenting time in dependency and neglect cases while ensuring the safety and well-being of all participants;

Study best practices for judicial review of visitation and parenting time plans;

Evaluate the rights and remedies for parents and children or youth pertaining to parenting time, including sibling visitation;

Consider whether the statutes and legal standards for ordering parenting time are consistent with best practices;

Consider whether current language in the "Colorado Children's Code" and rules should be updated or modernized, including replacing the term "visitation" with "parenting time" or "family time";

Study best practices to meet the developmental needs of youth through parenting time in a trauma-informed manner;

Study best practices for parenting time with incarcerated parents;

Study best practices for use of levels of supervised parenting time and consistency in the availability and definitions of different levels of supervised parenting time;

Recommend necessary changes to statute and rule to effectuate the recommended practices; and

Recommend best practices to ensure that families across the state have consistent access to high-quality parenting time where children are in out-of-home care.

In carrying out the purposes set forth in subsection (1) of this section, the task force shall consider:

The United States constitution and state constitution, case law, statutes, rules, practices, and standards that govern family parenting time or visitation in Colorado;

Best practices followed in other states or recommended by national child welfare experts to provide and determine parenting time plans that are in the best interests of children and which promote positive outcomes for families;

Federal guidance from the Administration on Children, Youth and Families regarding best practices in parenting time and visitation for children and youth in out-of-home care; and

Juvenile codes and rules from other states implementing best practices in parenting time.

The task force shall consider and recommend:

The best practices in parenting time for children placed in out-of-home care;

Changes to statute, rule, and practice necessary to implement the recommendations;

Considerations to ensure fair and equal access to high-quality parenting time for all families, including recommendations to ensure that culturally appropriate and inclusive services are equally available across the state; and

Identification of barriers to implementing best practices across the state and recommendations for addressing the barriers.

On or before October 1, 2022, the task force shall submit a written report to the governor; the state department; the child welfare training academy; the joint budget committee; and the house of representatives public and behavioral health and human services
committee and the senate health and human services committee, or any successor committees. The report must include, but is not limited to, the task force's findings concerning best practices to improve high-quality parenting time
services and practices in dependency and neglect cases and recommendations concerning necessary changes in state statute and administrative rules to implement those best practices and recommendations.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire part added, (HB 21-1101), ch. 481, p. 3433, § 5, effective July 7.

19-3-905. Repeal of part.

This part 9 is repealed, effective July 1, 2023.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire part added, (HB 21-1101), ch. 481, p. 3435, § 5, effective July 7.